Hawaii statutes.
§712-1202 Promoting prostitution in the
first degree. (1) A person commits the offense of promoting prostitution
in the first degree if the person knowingly:

(a) Advances prostitution by compelling or inducing
a person by force, threat, fraud, or intimidation to engage in prostitution, or
profits from such conduct by another; or

(b) Advances or profits from prostitution of a
person less than eighteen years old.

(2) Promoting prostitution in the first degree
is a class A felony.

(3) As used in this section:

"Fraud" means making material false
statements, misstatements, or omissions.

"Threat" means any of the actions
listed in section 707-764(1). [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 130, §2; am
L 2008, c 147, §8; am L 2011, c 145, §3]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next